District of Columbia statutes.
22-2722

Keeping bawdy or disorderly houses.

Whoever is convicted of keeping a bawdy or disorderly house in the District shall be fined not more than the amount set forth in § 22-3571.01 or imprisoned not more than 5 years, or both.

July 16, 1912, 37 Stat. 192, ch. 235, § 1
Dec. 23, 1963, 77 Stat. 617, Pub. L. 88-241, § 11(a)
Aug. 20, 1994, D.C. Law 10-151, § 107, 41 DCR 2608
Apr. 24, 2007, D.C. Law 16-306, § 215, 53 DCR 8610
June 11, 2013, D.C. Law 19-317, § 203(a)(2), 60 DCR 2064

History

Unlawful ownership or possession of a pistol, persons convicted under this section, see § 22-4503.

Cross References

This section is referenced in § 22-1831, § 22-2701.01, § 22-2731, and § 22-4001.

Section References

1981 Ed., § 22-2722.
1973 Ed., § 22-2722.

Prior Codifications

D.C. Law 16-306 substituted “$5,000 or imprisoned not more than 5 years, or both” for “$1,000 or imprisoned not more than 180 days, or both”.
The 2013 amendment by D.C. Law 19-317 substituted “not more than the amount set forth in § 22-3571.01” for “not more than $5,000”.

Effect of Amendments

For temporary amendment of section, see § 107 of the Omnibus Criminal Justice Reform Emergency Amendment Act of 1994 (D.C. Act 10-255, June 22, 1994, 41 DCR 4286).
For temporary (90 day) amendment of section, see § 215 of Omnibus Public Safety Emergency Amendment Act of 2006 (D.C. Act 16-445, July 19, 2006, 53 DCR 6443).
For temporary (90 day) amendment of section, see § 215 of Omnibus Public Safety Congressional Review Emergency Amendment Act of 2006 (D.C. Act 16-490, October 18, 2006, 53 DCR 8686).
For temporary (90 day) amendment of section, see § 215 of Omnibus Public Safety Congressional Review Emergency Amendment Act of 2007 (D.C. Act 17-10, January 16, 2007, 54 DCR 1479).
For temporary (90 day) amendment of section, see § 215 of Omnibus Public Safety Second Congressional Review Emergency Amendment Act of 2007 (D.C. Act 17-25, April 19, 2007, 54 DCR 4036).
For temporary (90 days) amendment of this section, see § 203(a)(2) of the Criminal Fine Proportionality Emergency Act of 2013 (D.C. Act 20-45, April 1, 2013, 60 DCR 5400, 20 DCSTAT 1300).

Emergency Legislation

Applicability of D.C. Law 19-317: Section 401 of D.C. Law 19-317 provided that the act shall apply only to offenses committed on or after June 11, 2013.

Editor's Notes